Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1813
Inquest; warrant of arrest; contents.

The warrant of the coroner shall recite substantially the verdict of the jury of inquest, and such warrant shall be a sufficient foundation for the proceedings of the justice instead of a complaint.

Laws 1879, § 108, p. 383;

R.S.1913, § 5675;

C.S.1922, § 5005;

C.S.1929, § 26-1514;

R.S.1943, § 23-1813.